Florida, session 2026, HB451.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) and paragraph (a) of subsection
(2) of section 112.1815, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
112.1815 Firefighters, paramedics, emergency medical
technicians, and law enforcement officers, and 911 public safety
telecommunicators; special provisions for employment-related
accidents and injuries.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "First responder" as used in this section means a law
enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10, a firefighter as
defined in s. 633.102, or an emergency medical technician or
paramedic as defined in s. 401.23 employed by state or local
government. A volunteer law enforcement officer, firefighter, or
emergency medical technician or paramedic engaged by the state
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb451-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 451 2026
or a local government is also considered a first responder of
the state or local government for purposes of this section.
(b) "911 public safety telecommunicator" has the same
meaning as in s. 401.465(1).
(2)(a) For the purpose of determining benefits under this
section relating to employment-related accidents and injuries of
first responders and 911 public safety telecommunicators, the
following shall apply:
1. An injury or disease caused by the exposure to a toxic
substance is not an injury by accident arising out of employment
unless there is a preponderance of the evidence establishing
that exposure to the specific substance involved, at the levels
to which the first responder was exposed, can cause the injury
or disease sustained by the employee.
2. Any adverse result or complication caused by a smallpox
vaccination of a first responder is deemed to be an injury by
accident arising out of work performed in the course and scope
of employment.
3. A mental or nervous injury involving a first responder
or a 911 public safety telecommunicator and occurring as a
manifestation of a compensable injury must be demonstrated by
clear and convincing evidence. For a mental or nervous injury
arising out of the employment unaccompanied by a physical injury
involving a first responder or a 911 public safety
telecommunicator, only medical benefits under s. 440.13 shall be
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb451-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 451 2026
payable for the mental or nervous injury. However, payment of
indemnity as provided in s. 440.15 may not be made unless a
physical injury arising out of injury as a first responder
accompanies the mental or nervous injury. Benefits for a first
responder are not subject to any limitation on temporary
benefits under s. 440.093 or the 1-percent limitation on
permanent psychiatric impairment benefits under s. 440.15(3)(c).
Benefits for a 911 public safety telecommunicator are not
subject to any limitation on temporary benefits under s.
440.093.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb451-00